Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3323
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the License Suspension Act.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 159.